Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.150

Unlawful practices.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to distribute within the state or deliver for transportation or transport in intrastate commerce or between points within this state through any point outside this state any of the following:

(a) Any pesticide which has not been registered pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(b) Any pesticide if any of the claims made for it or any of the directions for its use or other labeling differs from the representations made in connection with its registration, or if the composition of a pesticide differs from its composition as represented in connection with its registration: PROVIDED, That at the discretion of the director, a change in the labeling or formula of a pesticide may be made within a registration period without requiring reregistration of the product;

(c) Any pesticide unless it is in the registrant's or the manufacturer's unbroken immediate container and there is affixed to such container, and to the outside container or wrapper of the retail package, if there is one through which the required information on the immediate container cannot be clearly read, a label bearing the information required in this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter;

(d) Any pesticide unless it has been distinctly denatured as to color, taste, odor, or form if so required by rule;

(e) Any pesticide which is adulterated or misbranded, or any device which is misbranded;

(f) Any pesticide in containers, violating rules adopted pursuant to RCW 15.58.040(2)(f) or pesticides found in containers which are unsafe due to damage.

(2) It shall be unlawful:

(a) To sell or deliver any pesticide to any person who is required by law or rules promulgated under such law to be certified, licensed, or have a permit to use or purchase the pesticide unless such person or the person's agent, to whom sale or delivery is made, has a valid certification, license, or permit to use or purchase the kind and quantity of such pesticide sold or delivered: PROVIDED, That, subject to conditions established by the director, such permit may be obtained immediately prior to sale or delivery from any person designated by the director;

(b) For any person to detach, alter, deface or destroy, wholly or in part, any label or labeling provided for in this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, or to add any substance to, or take any substance from, a pesticide in a manner that may defeat the purpose of this chapter or the rules adopted thereunder;

(c) For any person to use or cause to be used any pesticide contrary to label directions or to regulations of the director if those regulations differ from or further restrict the label directions: PROVIDED, The compliance to the term "contrary to label directions" is enforced by the director consistent with the intent of this chapter;

(d) For any person to use for his or her own advantage or to reveal, other than to the director or proper officials or employees of the state, or to the courts of the state in response to a subpoena, or to physicians, or in emergencies to pharmacists and other qualified persons for use in the preparation of antidotes, any information relative to formulas of products acquired by authority of RCW 15.58.060;

(e) For any person to make false, misleading, or erroneous statements or reports concerning any pest during or after a pest inspection or to fail to comply with criteria established by rule for structural pest inspections;

(f) For any person to make false, misleading, or erroneous statements or reports in connection with any pesticide complaint or investigation;

(g) For any person to act as, or advertise that they perform the services of, a structural pest inspector without having a license to act as a structural pest inspector;

(h) For a business to conduct one or more complete wood destroying organism inspections without first having obtained a structural pest inspection company license from the department.

[ 2012 c 25 s 6; 2003 c 212 s 3; 2000 c 96 s 6; 1991 c 264 s 3; 1989 c 380 s 11; 1987 c 45 s 25; 1979 c 146 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 15.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1987 c 45: See notes following RCW 15.54.270.